Indiana, session 2026, HB1325.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-19-3-41.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 41.8. (a) Not later than October
1, 2026, the department, in collaboration with the Indiana
department of health, the department of child services, and the
office of the secretary of family and social services, shall
collaborate and submit to the general assembly in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-16, a report that includes information and,
as applicable, recommendations on the following:
(1) Data on the number of students who are using excess cost
funds for residential placement and the cost each public
school, including charter schools, expends yearly on required
payments to access state funds.
(2) Data on the amount each public school, including charter
schools, is expending above state provided funding on
developmental preschool.
(3) Data on the number of special education students receiving
homebound instruction in each public school, including
charter schools, and the associated costs for each public
school, including charter schools.
(4) Data on the costs, including transportation and interpreter
fees, incurred by each public school, including charter
HEA 1325

2
schools, for students who are eligible to enroll in, but choose
not to enroll in, the Indiana School for the Blind and Visually
Impaired or the Indiana School for the Deaf.
(b) This section expires January 1, 2027.
HEA 1325

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1325